Washington statutes.
RCW 18.89.090

Licensure—Qualifications.

(1) The secretary shall issue a license to any applicant who demonstrates to the secretary's satisfaction that the following requirements have been met:

(a) Graduation from a school approved by the secretary or successful completion of alternate training which meets the criteria established by the secretary;

(b)(i) For licenses issued prior to July 1, 2022, successful completion of an examination administered or approved by the secretary.

(ii) For licenses issued on or after July 1, 2022, successful completion of both an examination administered or approved by the secretary and a clinical simulation examination administered or approved by the secretary. The secretary may deem an applicant in compliance with this subsection (1)(b)(ii) if the applicant possesses an active credential in good standing as a registered respiratory therapist issued by a national organization such as the national board for respiratory care, if one of the requirements for the issuance of the credential is passage of the examinations required by this subsection (1)(b)(ii);

(c) Successful completion of any experience requirement established by the secretary;

(d) Good moral character.

In addition, applicants shall be subject to the grounds for denial or issuance of a conditional license under chapter 18.130 RCW.

(2) The secretary shall establish by rule what constitutes adequate proof of meeting the criteria.

[ 2021 c 114 s 5; 1997 c 334 s 8; 1991 c 3 s 232; 1987 c 415 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 114: See note following RCW 18.89.010.

Effective dates—1997 c 334: See note following RCW 18.89.010.